Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.350

Rules—Enforcement of chapter.

The director may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. It shall be the duty of the director to enforce and carry out the provisions of this chapter and/or rules adopted hereunder. No person shall interfere with the director when he or she is performing or carrying out duties imposed on him or her by this chapter and/or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 1994 c 46 s 8; 1959 c 54 s 35.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.